Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-613
Licensee; solicitor; complaint; citation; notice; hearing.

The board may, upon its own motion, and shall, upon the sworn complaint of any customer or client of a licensee, cite such licensee or solicitor of such licensee to appear before it at a time and place as set forth in such citation to show cause, if any, why such license or certificate should not be suspended or revoked. Such citation shall be in writing and shall set forth the exact charges against the licensee or solicitor, and a true copy thereof shall be served on such licensee or solicitor at least twenty days prior to the day of hearing in the same manner as summons of the district courts are served. If the citation is against a solicitor, a true copy of the citation shall also be served upon the licensee under whose license the solicitor's certificate has been issued.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 17, p. 1600;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,174;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 261, § 13.